en: Zongzi
fr: Zongzi, Zong zi
zh: 粽子, zòngzi

en: Frozen Zongzi
fr: Zongzi surgelés

en: Paella, Paëlla
bg: Паеля
de: Paella
es: Paella
fi: paella
fr: Paëllas, paëlla
hr: Paella
it: Paella
ja: パエリア
nl: Paellas

en: Risottos
bg: Ризото
de: Risotto
es: Risotto
fi: risotot
fr: Risottos
hr: Rižota
it: Risotti
ja: リゾット
nl: Risottos, Risotto

en: Risotto with seafood, Seafood risotto
fr: Risotto aux fruits de mer

en: Crab risottos
fr: Risottos au crabe

en: Shrimp risottos
fr: Risottos aux crevettes
hr: Rižoto od kozica
nl: Garnaalrisotto

en: Salmon risottos
de: Lachsrisotto, Lachs-Risotto
fr: Risottos au saumon
hr: Rižoto od lososa
nl: Zalmrisotto

en: Veal risottos
fr: Risottos au veau, risottos de veau
hr: Teleći rižoti
nl: Kalfsvleesrisotto

en: Chicken risottos
fi: Kanarisotot
fr: Risottos au poulet
hr: Pileći rižoti
nl: Kiprisottos, kiprisotto

en: Risotto with cheese, Cheese risotto
fr: Risotto aux fromages, Risotto au fromage
hr: Rižoto sa sirom
it: Risotto con formaggio

en: Quinoa dishes
de: Quinoa-Gerichte
fi: Kvinoa-ateriat
fr: Plats à base de quinoa
hr: Jela od kvinoje
lt: Kvinojos patiekalai
nl: Quinoaschotels

en: Lentil dishes
de: Linsengerichte
fi: Linssiruoat
fr: Plats à base de lentilles
hr: Jela od leće
lt: Lęšių patiekalai
nl: Linzengerechten

en: Savory semolina dishes
de: Couscous Fertiggerichte
fi: Suolaiset suurimoruoat
fr: Plats à base de semoule
hr: Slana jela od griza
it: Piatti a base di couscous
lt: Pikantiški manų kruopų patiekalai
nl: Hartige griesmeelschotels, Hartige griesmeelschotel

en: Bulgur dishes
fr: Plats à base de boulgour
hr: Jela od bulgura
lt: Bulgur patiekalai

en: Potato dishes
da: Kartoffelretter
de: Kartoffelgerichte
fr: Plats à base de pommes de terre
hr: Jela od krumpira
it: Piatti pronti a base di patate
lt: Bulvių patiekalai
nl: Aardappelgerechten

en: Pyttipanna
xx: Pyttipanna
da: Biksemad
fi: Pyttipannu
ja: ピティパンナ
nb: Pyttipanne, Pytt i panne
ru: Питтипанна
sv: Pyttipanna, Pytt i panna
uk: Піттіпанна

en: Krögarpytt
sv: Krögarpytt

en: Chop suey
xx: Chop suey
fr: Chop suey

en: Chicken chop suey
fr: Chop suey de poulet, Chop suey au poulet